Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-818
Hearing; time; place; objection; effect.

For the purpose of conducting hearings pursuant to the provisions of sections 42-801 to 42-823, the conciliation court may be convened at any time and place within the county, and the hearing may be had in chambers or otherwise, except that the time and place for hearing shall not be different from the time and place provided by law for the trial of civil actions if any party, prior to the hearing, objects to any different time or place.

Laws 1965, c. 228, § 18, p. 660.